tr_test.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX њ tmek dinememişiz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişlerdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişlerse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişlik tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişlik/ЦъТшйѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişsek tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişseler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişsem tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişsen tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişseniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişsin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişsindir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişsiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememişsinizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinememiştir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemese tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemesek tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeseler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeselerdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemesem tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemesen tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeseniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeseydi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeseydik tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeseydiler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeseydim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeseydin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeseydiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemesin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemesinler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebildi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirdik tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirdim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirdin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirdiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirimdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliriz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirlerdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirlik tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirlik/ЦъТшйѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirmiş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirsin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirsindir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirsiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilirsinizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyor tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyordu tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyorlar/Ў tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyormuş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyorsa tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyorsun tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyorsunuz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyorum tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebiliyoruz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyebilse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyecakken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyecek tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyecek/ЦъТшйѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeceğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфЎ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyecekken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyecekler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeceklerdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeceksindir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeceksinizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyecekti tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeceğim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeceğimdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeceğiz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeceğizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeli tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyelim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyemeden tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyen tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyen/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyerek tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyerken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyesi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyesi/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyeyim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyici tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyici/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyince tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyinceye tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyip tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyirken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyiz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyiş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemeyiş/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemez tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezdik tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezdiler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezdim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezdin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezdiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezlerdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezlerdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezlermiş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezmiş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezmişim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezmişiz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezmişler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezmişsin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezmişsiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezsek tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezseler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezsem tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezsen tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezseniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezsin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezsindir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezsiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemezsinizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyor tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyordu tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorduk tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyordum tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyordun tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyordunuz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyordur tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorlar/Ў tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorlardı tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorlardır tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorlarmış tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorlarsa tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyormuş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyormuşlar/Ў tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyormuşsun tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyormuşsunuz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyormuşum tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyormuşuz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsa tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsak tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsalar/Ў tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsam tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsan tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsanız tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsun tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsundur tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsunuz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorsunuzdur tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorum tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyorumdur tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyoruz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinemiyoruzdur tmek
SFX њ tmek dinen tmek
SFX њ tmek dinen/ЙЂѢЦъЫТшйтвжнфѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek diner tmek
SFX њ tmek dinercesine tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerdik tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerdiler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerdim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerdin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerdiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerek tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerimdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dineriz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerlerdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerlerdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerlerken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerlermiş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerlerse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinermiş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinermişim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinermişiz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinermişler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinermişsin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinermişsiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinersek tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerseler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinersem tmek
SFX њ tmek dinersen tmek
SFX њ tmek dinerseniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinersin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinersindir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinersiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinersinizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinesi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinesi/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinesin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinesiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dineyim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinici tmek
SFX њ tmek dinici/ЛѥѽЦъѬѩшйтвжнфѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinince tmek
SFX њ tmek dininceye tmek
SFX њ tmek dininiz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinip tmek
SFX њ tmek dinir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinircesine tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirdik tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirdiler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirdim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirdin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirdiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirimdir tmek
SFX њ tmek diniriz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirlerdi tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirlerdir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirlerken tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirlermiş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirlerse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirmiş tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirmişim tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirmişiz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirmişler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirmişsin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirmişsiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirse tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirsek tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirseler/ѧ tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirsem tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirsen tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirseniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirsin tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirsindir tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirsiniz tmek
SFX њ tmek dinirsinizdir tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyor tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyordu tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorduk tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyordular/Ў tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyordum tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyordun tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyordunuz tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyordur tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorken tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorlar/Ў tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorlardı tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorlardır tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorlarmış tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorlarsa tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyormuş tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyormuşlar/Ў tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyormuşsun tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyormuşsunuz tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyormuşum tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyormuşuz tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorsa tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorsak tmek
SFX њ tmek diniyorsalar/Ў tmek
