tr_test.dic
akdetmek/њ
hatmetmek/њ
cebretmek/њ
feshetmek/њ
haptetmek/њ
azletmek/њ
lütfetmek/њ
tayyetmek/њ
hazfetmek/њ
küfretmek/њ
hamletmek/њ
defetmek/њ
haccetmek/њ
şakketmek/њ
gitmek/њ
atfetmek/њ
zemmetmek/њ
nakşetmek/њ
hakketmek/њ
ditmek/њ
hasretmek/њ
addetmek/њ
etmek/њ
şükretmek/њ
nefyetmek/њ
dahletmek/њ
mahvetmek/њ
affetmek/њ
haletmek/њ
hicvetmek/њ
nezretmek/њ
mezcetmek/њ
raptetmek/њ
bahsetmek/њ
kaybetmek/њ
hamdetmek/њ
hazmetmek/њ
cezbetmek/њ
keşfetmek/њ
vakfetmek/њ
keyfetmek/њ
resmetmek/њ
katetmek/њ
gasletmek/њ
gusletmek/њ
fethetmek/њ
tabetmek/њ
nakzetmek/њ
hıfzetmek/њ
vehmetmek/њ
hapsetmek/њ
ahzetmek/њ
reddetmek/њ
seyretmek/њ
katletmek/њ
sabretmek/њ
rekzetmek/њ
sırretmek/њ
defnetmek/њ
massetmek/њ
aksetmek/њ
neşretmek/њ
zannetmek/њ
methetmek/њ
hükmetmek/њ
azmetmek/њ
lağvetmek/њ
ahdetmek/њ
leffetmek/њ
halletmek/њ
kastetmek/њ
haczetmek/њ
gasbetmek/њ
menetmek/њ
darbetmek/њ
nakletmek/њ
serdetmek/њ
süregitmek/њ
nasbetmek/њ
raksetmek/њ
gaspetmek/њ
setretmek/њ
nezetmek/њ
fasletmek/њ
kaydetmek/њ
devretmek/њ
recmetmek/њ
zikretmek/њ
hazzetmek/њ
cehdetmek/њ
emretmek/њ
meyletmek/њ
meshetmek/њ
celbetmek/њ
zulmetmek/њ
vazetmek/њ
kesbetmek/њ
cemetmek/њ
gadretmek/њ
zammetmek/њ
kahretmek/њ
nüksetmek/њ
vadetmek/њ
zehretmek/њ
hissetmek/њ
bahşetmek/њ
ettirtmek/њ
hisset/њ
hissettirtmek/њ
seyret/њ
